en: wild cranberry
hr: šumska brusnica
it: mirtillo rosso selvatico

en: bearberry, bearberries
it: uva ursina
la: Arctostaphylos uva-ursi

en: cranberry flavouring
hr: aroma brusnice
it: aroma di mirtillo rosso

en: mammy apple, mamey
la: Mammea americana

en: mamey sapote
la: Pouteria sapota

en: medlar, loquat
bg: мушмула
de: Mispel, Mispeln, Loquat
es: nispero
fr: Néflier
hr: mušmula
it: nespola comune

en: mango, mangoes
af: Veselperske
ar: منجا
as: আম
ay: Catuña
az: Manqo
bg: манго
bh: आम
bm: Mangoro
bn: আম
br: Mangez
ca: mango
cs: Mango
da: Mango
de: Mango, Mangos
dv: އަނބު
dz: ཨམ་ཅུ་ཀུ་ལི
ee: Maŋgo
el: Μάνγκο
es: mango
et: Mango
eu: Mango
fa: انبه
fi: Mango
fr: mangue, mangues
ga: Mangó
gl: Manga
hi: आम
hr: mango, manga, od manga
ht: Mango
hu: Mangó
id: Mangga
io: Mango
is: Mangó
it: mango
ka: მანგო
kg: Manga
ko: 망고
kv: Манго
lb: Mango
lv: Mango
mg: Manga
mk: манго
ms: Mangga
my: သရက်သီး
nl: mango
nv: Naakaii bichʼil łitsxooí
oc: Manga
os: Манго
pa: ਅੰਬ
pl: Mango
pt: manga
ru: Манго
rw: Umwembe
sd: انب
sk: Mango
sl: mango
so: Cambe
sr: mango
sv: mango
sw: Embe
ta: மா
tg: Анба
tr: Mango
ty: Vī
ug: مانگو
uk: Манго
ur: آم
uz: अं
vi: Xoài
za: Makmanghgoj
zh: 芒果

fr: Mangue importée en avion
de: Mango importiert mit dem Flugzeug
es: Mango importado en avión
it: Mango importato in aereo
nl: Mango geïmporteerd per vliegtuig
pt: Manga importada por avião
ru: Манго импортировано самолетом

fr: Mangue importée en bateau
en: Mango imported by boat
de: Mango importiert per Schiff
es: Mango importado por barco
hr: mango uvezen brodom
it: Mango importato via nave
nl: Mango geïmporteerd per boot

en: mango juice
de: Mangosaft
es: jugo de mango
fr: jus de mangue
hr: sok od manga
it: succo di mango
nl: mangosap
pt: suco de manga, sumo de manga
ru: манговый сок

en: concentrated mango juice
de: konzentrierter Mangosaft
es: jugo de mango concentrado
fr: jus de mangue concentrés
hr: koncentrirani sok od manga
it: succo di mango concentrato
nl: geconcentreerd mangosap
pt: suco de manga concentrado, sumo de manga concentrado
ru: концентрированный манговый сок

en: mango puree
bg: пюре от манго
de: Mangopüree, Mangopulpe, Mangomark
es: Puré de mango
fi: mangopyree
fr: purée de mangue, purée de mangues, pulpe de mangue
hr: pire od manga
it: polpa di mango
nl: mangopuree
pl: przecier z mango, puree z mango
pt: Puré de manga, polpa de manga
ru: манговое пюре, пюре манго
sv: mangopuré

en: concentrated mango puree
de: konzentriertes Mangopüree
es: pure de mango concentrado
fr: puré concentrée de mangue
hr: koncentrirani pire od manga
it: purea di mango concentrata
nl: geconcentreerde mangopuree

en: mango puree from concentrate
fr: purée de mangue à base de purée concentrée
it: purea di mango da concentrato
pl: przecier mango z zagęszczonego przecieru

en: mango puree partially from concentrate
fr: purée de mangue partiellement à base de concentré
it: purea di mango parzialmente da concentrato

en: Mango mix
de: Mangomischung
es: Mix de mango
fi: mangosekoitus
fr: préparation à base de mangue
nl: mango mix

en: mango flavouring
de: Mangoaroma
es: aroma de mango
fi: mangoaromi
fr: arôme de mangue
hr: aroma manga
it: aroma di mango
pl: aromat mango
sv: mangoarom

en: natural mango flavouring
ca: aroma natural de mango
de: natürliches Mangoaroma, natürliches Mango-Aroma
fi: luontainen mangoaromi
fr: arôme naturel de mangue
hr: prirodna aroma manga
hu: természetes mangó aroma
it: aroma naturale di mango

en: peach, peaches
an: presiquera
ar: دراق
be: Персік
bg: Праскова, праскови
br: Pechez
bs: Breskva
ca: préssec
cs: broskev
da: fersken, ferskener
de: Pfirsich, Pfirsiche
el: Ροδάκινο
eo: persiko
es: Melocotón, melocotones, durazno, duraznos
fi: persikka, persikat
fr: pêche
gl: Pexego
hi: आड़ू
hr: breskva, breskve, bresaka
hu: őszibarack
io: Persiko
it: pesca, pesche
ja: もも, モモ, 桃, ピーチ
kk: Шабдалы
lb: Piisch
lv: persiks
nl: perziken, perzik
oc: Persec
pl: Brzoskwinia, brzoskwinie, brzoskwiń, brzoskwiniowy, brzoskwiniowego, brzoskwini
pt: pêssegos
ro: piersici
ru: персик
sk: Broskyňa
sv: persika, persikor
tr: şeftali
zh: 桃子

en: flat peach, saturn peach, donut peach, paraguayo
ar: دراق مبلط
ca: préssec pla
de: Plattpfirsich
es: paraguaya, chato
et: Lamevirsik
fa: هلو انجیری
fr: pêche plate, pëches plates
gl: Pexego chato
he: אפרסק פיתה
hr: ravna breskva
it: pesca tabacchiera
ja: バントウ
nl: platte perzik
ru: инжирный персик
sr: Пљосната бресква
tg: Анҷиршафтолу
vi: bàn đào
zh: 蟠桃